Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-104] Powers of the commission. The
commission may:

(1) Adopt rules pursuant to section 431:30-112, which
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in the compacting
states to the extent and in the manner provided in this article;

(2) Exercise its rulemaking authority and establish
reasonable uniform standards for products covered under the compact, and
advertisements related thereto, which shall have the force and effect of law
and shall be binding in the compacting states, but only for such products filed
with the commission; provided that a compacting state may opt out of such
uniform standard pursuant to section 431:30-112, to the extent and in the
manner provided in this article; provided further that any uniform standard established
by the commission for long-term care insurance products may provide the same or
greater protections for consumers as, but shall not provide less than, those
protections set forth in the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
long-term care insurance model act and long-term care insurance model
regulation, respectively, adopted as of 2001. The commission shall consider
whether any subsequent amendments to the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners long-term care insurance model act or the long-term care
insurance model regulation adopted by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners require amending of the uniform standards established by the
commission for long-term care insurance products;

(3) Receive and review in an expeditious manner
products filed with the commission, and rate filings for disability income and
long-term care insurance products, and give approval of those products and rate
filings that satisfy the applicable uniform standard, where such approval shall
have the force and effect of law and be binding on the compacting states to the
extent and in the manner provided in the compact;

(4) Receive and review in an expeditious manner
advertisement relating to long-term care insurance products for which uniform
standards have been adopted by the commission, and give approval to all
advertisement that satisfies the applicable uniform standard. For any product
covered under this compact, other than long-term care insurance products, the
commission may require an insurer to submit all or any part of its
advertisement with respect to that product for review or approval prior to use,
if the commission determines that the nature of the product is such that an
advertisement of the product could have the capacity or tendency to mislead the
public. The actions of the commission as provided in this section shall have
the force and effect of law and shall be binding on the compacting states to
the extent and in the manner provided in the compact;

(5) Exercise its rulemaking authority and designate
products and advertisements that may be subject to a self-certification process
without the need for prior approval by the commission;

(6) Adopt operating procedures pursuant to section
431:30-112, which shall be binding on the compacting states to the extent and
in the manner provided in this article;

(7) Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions
in its name as the commission; provided that the standing of any state
insurance department to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;

(8) Issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence;

(9) Establish and maintain offices;

(10) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

(11) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of
personnel, including but not limited to employees of a compacting state;

(12) Hire employees, professionals, or specialists,
and elect or appoint officers, determine their qualifications, fix their
compensation, define their duties, and give them appropriate authority to carry
out the purposes of the compact, and establish the commission's personnel
policies and programs relating to, among other things, conflicts of interest,
rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel;

(13) Accept any and all appropriate donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive,
use, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall
strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety;

(14) Lease, purchase, and accept appropriate gifts or
donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use, any property, real,
personal, or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to
avoid any appearance of impropriety;

(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(16) Remit filing fees to compacting states as may be
set forth in the bylaws, rules, or operating procedures;

(17) Enforce compliance by compacting states with
rules, uniform standards, operating procedures, and bylaws;

(18) Provide for dispute resolution among compacting
states;

(19) Advise compacting states on issues relating to
insurers domiciled or doing business in noncompacting jurisdictions, consistent
with the purposes of this compact;

(20) Provide advice and training to those personnel in
state insurance departments responsible for product review, and be a resource
for state insurance departments;

(21) Establish a budget and make expenditures;

(22) Borrow money;

(23) Appoint committees, including advisory committees
comprised of members, state insurance regulators, state legislators or their
representatives, insurance industry and consumer representatives, and such
other interested persons as may be designated in the bylaws;

(24) Provide and receive information from, and
cooperate with law enforcement agencies;

(25) Adopt and use a corporate seal; and

(26) Perform such other functions as may be necessary
or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with state
regulation of the business of insurance. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next